Utah statutes.
41-12a-603.   Operating motor vehicle without license or registration.

Any person whose license or registration or nonresident's operating privilege has been suspended or revoked under this chapter and who, during the suspension or revocation drives any motor vehicle upon any highway or knowingly permits any motor vehicle owned by the person to be operated by another upon any highway, except as permitted under this chapter, is guilty of a class  C misdemeanor.

